Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,120
District or company; notice to landowner; when required; terms, defined.

(1) Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal company using the procedure described in sections 46-2,121 to 46-2,129 and which is exempt from the Open Meetings Act shall provide notice by mail to each owner of land in the district or served by the company not less than seven days before any meeting or hearing under sections 46-2,121 to 46-2,129.

(2) For purposes of sections 46-2,120 to 46-2,130:

(a) Chief Water Officer means the Chief Water Officer of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(b) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 153;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 137.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.